src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! # Skolt Saami adjective declension


LEXICON A_
+Attr: # ;
+Sg+Nom: K ; ! Trond: Rest of cases not done.

LEXICON A_GENATTR
+GenAttr: # ;
LEXICON A_SJM ! These are problems 2018-11-2
+Err/Orth+Attr: # ;


LEXICON A_PSS-PRFPRC
! These might simply be left out of the fst
+V+Pass+PrfPrc: # ;

LEXICON A_ACT-PRFPRC
! These might simply be left out of the fst
+V+Act+PrfPrc: # ;! Needs fixing 2020-06-08

LEXICON A-ATTR_
!! These come directly from the xml to lexc xsltransformation lexica
+Attr: # ;
: A2N-VUOTT ; 

LEXICON A-ATTR_ys
+Attr:%>âs # ;
+Der+Der/Comp+A+Attr:»ab # ;
+Der+Der/Comp+A:»ab A-01_AANAR ;
A_IS_ADJ-DER/SUPERL_mws ;
:%>âs A2N-VUOTT ;

LEXICON A-ATTR_as
+Attr:%>as # ;
+Der+Der/Comp+A+Attr:»ab # ;
+Der+Der/Comp+A:»ab A-01_AANAR ;
A_IS_ADJ-DER/SUPERL_mws ;
:%>as A2N-VUOTT ;

LEXICON A-ATTR_es
+Attr:%>es # ;
: ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ; !!= * @CODE@ This has a Comp+Attr
!+Der+Der/Comp+A:»ab A-01_AANAR ;
A_IS_ADJ-DER/SUPERL_mws ;
:%>es A2N-VUOTT ;



!! CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
LEXICON A_PAPP !!= * @CODE@ papp:papp
!! 
:%^V2VV A-ATTR_ys ;
:  A-01_PAPP ;

LEXICON A_TOLL
:%^V2VV%^CC2C A-ATTR_ys ;
: A-01_TOLL ;

LEXICON A_ALGG !!= * @CODE@ põrtt:põrtt
!! friskk
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_ys ;
: A-01_ALGG ;

LEXICON A_AUTT !!= * @CODE@ autt:a%^1VOWutt
!! friskk
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_ys ;
: A-01_AUTT ;


LEXICON A_MUORR !!= * @CODE@ muõrr:muõrr
:%^CC2C A-ATTR_ys ;
: A-01_MUORR ;

LEXICON A_NUORR !!= * @CODE@ nuõrr:nuõrr
+Attr: # ;
: A-01_MUORR ;

LEXICON A_SHIOGHGH !!= * @CODE@ šiõǥǥ:šiõǥǥ
!! Need work on derivation since this only has positive form. 2018-10-13
+Attr: # ;
: A-01_LUOSS ; ! Trond. Check.


LEXICON	A_KOOKKA !!= * @CODE@	kookka length of/pituinen
!! no gradation, has preceding genitive 2018-10-13
+Attr: # ;     ! Trond. Check
: NMN_BUKVA ;  ! Trond. Check.

LEXICON A_KUOCC !!= * @CODE@ kuõcc:kuõcc
+Attr:%^KK2GG%>âs # ;
+Der+Der/Comp+A+Attr:%^KK2GG%>»j»ab # ;
+Der+Der/Comp+A:%^KK2GG%>%{ʼØ%}j»ab A-01_AANAR ;
+Der+Der/Superl+A+Attr:%^KK2GG%>»j»ummus # ;
+Der+Der/Superl+A:%^KK2GG%>%{ʼØ%}j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
: A-01_LUOSS ;

LEXICON A_CHUOSHKK !!= * @CODE@ čuõškk:čuõškk
!! tuõlbb
:%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_ys ;
: A-01_CHUOSHKK ;

LEXICON A_MIYRKK !!= * @CODE@ sǩiâŋkk:sǩiâŋkk
!! hiâlpp
:%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_ys ;
: A-01_MIYRKK ;

LEXICON A_PLAAN !!= * @CODE@ plaan:plaan
:%^V2VV A-ATTR_ys ; !!Check this 2015-09-17
: A-01_PLAAN ;

!!
LEXICON A_SUYMMM !!= * @CODE@ suâmm:suâmˈm
!! 
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_NEAVVV ;! !Check this 2016-09-16 

LEXICON A_MODDAI !!= * @CODE@ moddai:moddai
! Used mainly with Russian loan words
+Attr: ENDLEX ; !!Check this 2020-06-09
: SG-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^V2VV SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^Pen%^V2VV PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^I2J PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@


!! CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
LEXICON A_PESS
+Attr: ENDLEX ;
: A-01_PESS ;

LEXICON A_SHOOMM
+Attr: ENDLEX ;
: A-01_SHOOMM ;

LEXICON A_TUYJJ
:%^CC2C  A-ATTR_as ;
: A-01_TUYJJ ;

LEXICON A_VAEAEZHZH
! Gradation: None
! 1.115
!! * Yaml: **A-vaeaezhzh**
+Attr: ENDLEX ;
: A-ATTR_as ;
: A-01_VAEAEZHZH ;

LEXICON A_KHEAEHN
: A-ATTR_as ;
+Der+Der/Comp+A+Attr:»ab # ;
+Der+Der/Comp+A:»ab A-01_AANAR ;
 A_IS_ADJ-DER/SUPERL_mws ;
: A-01_KAPTEAEN ;


!! CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, PALATALIZATION, ILLATIVE IN U NOMINALS


!! CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
LEXICON A_NUQBB  !!= * @CODE@ nuʹbb:nubb
! Gradation: None
! 1.115
!! * Yaml: **A-nubb**
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_NUQBB ;

LEXICON A_KUEQLL !!= * @CODE@ kueʹll:kuâll
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_KUEQLL ;

LEXICON A_PUEQRR !!= * @CODE@ pueʹrr:puâll
! vowel: diphthong
!šiõǥǥ
: A-01_KUEQLL ;

LEXICON A_MUEQRJJ !!= * @CODE@ mueʹrjj:mueʹrjj
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_MUEQRJJ ;

!! CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, PALATALIZATION NOMINALS

LEXICON A_LOAQDD !!= * @CODE@ väʹll:väll
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_LOAQDD ;

LEXICON A_UQCC !!= * @CODE@ uʹcc:u%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}cc
:%^PAL   A-ATTR_ ;
!:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_UQCC ;

LEXICON A_SAAQMM !!= * @CODE@ sääʹmm:sää%{ʹØ%}mm
:%^CC2C%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_SAAQMM ;

LEXICON A_CHAAQCC !!= * @CODE@ čääʹcc:čää%{ʹØ%}cc
:%^PAL%^KK2GG   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_CHAAQCC ;

LEXICON A_KAQLBB !!= * @CODE@ käʹlbb:kälbb âʹlǧǧ:â%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}lgg
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_KAQLBB ;

LEXICON A_HAAQSKH !!= * @CODE@ hääʹsǩ:hää%{ʹØ%}sk
! vowel: monophthong
! gradation: no
:%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_HAAQSKH ;

!LEXICON A_HITRAI !!= * @CODE@ hitrai:hitrai
!! no separate attribute form 2018-10-13
!! Russian loanword 
!+Attr: # ;
!+Sg+Nom: # ;
!+Pl+Nom: # ;
!:%^1VOW%^V2VVʹje SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@

LEXICON A_SEQTT !!= * @CODE@ seʹtt:sẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}tt
! vowel: monophthong
!! CHECKME
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_SEQTT ;


LEXICON A_KHEQRJJ !!= * @CODE@ ǩeʹrjj:ǩẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}rjj
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_KHEQRJJ ;

LEXICON A_JAEUQRR !!= * @CODE@ jäuʹrr:jä%^1VOWu%{ʹØ%}rr
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_JAEUQRR ;

LEXICON A_PEIQVV !!= * @CODE@ peiʹvv:pẹ%^1VOWi%{ʹØ%}vv
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_PEIQVV ;

LEXICON A_SUEAQKHKH !!= * @CODE@ sueʹǩǩ:suäkk
!! cuẹʹǩǩ
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^KK2GG   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_SUEAQKHKH ;

LEXICON A_KUEAQTT !!= * @CODE@ kuẹʹtt:kuätt
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PAL%^CC2C   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_KUEAQTT ;

LEXICON A_HIEAQNN !!= * @CODE@ hieʹnn:heänn
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PAL%^CC2C   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_HIEAQNN ;

LEXICON A_VUEQSS !!= * @CODE@ pueʹšš:puâ%{ʹØ%}šš
! vowel: diphthong
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^KK2GG   A-ATTR_es ; ! pueʹžžes
: A-01_VUEQSS ;

LEXICON A_JEAQNNN !!= * @CODE@ jeäʹnn:jeänˈn, jeäʹǧǧ:jeägˈg
! vowel: diphthong
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CCC2CC   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_JEAQNNN ;

LEXICON A_JEAQRMM !!= * @CODE@ jeäʹrmm:jeärmm
! vowel: diphthong
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
: A-01_JEAQRMM ;

LEXICON A_CHUAQRVV !!= * @CODE@ tuäʹŋǧǧ:tuäŋgg
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ; !tuẹʹŋǧes
: A-01_CHUAQRVV ;


!! CLASS denominals in -i
!! cf. Feist (2012: 198-199)
!! These will need their own expansions
!! HOW DOES JIÕʹNNI decline?
LEXICON A_JIOQNNI !!= * @CODE@ jiõʹnni:jiõnn FIXME 2016-04
+Attr:%^PAL%>es #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%^PAL%>i  # ;
:%^PAL%>%{ʼØ%}j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
:%^PAL%>%{ʼØ%}j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

!LEXICON A_AQLKHKHI !!= * @CODE@ aʹlǩǩi:alkk
!+Attr:%^PAL%>es #   ;
!+Sg+Nom:%^PAL%>i  # ;
!:%^PAL ADJ-DER/COMP_aeaeb ;
!!:%^PAL ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
!:%^PAL ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

LEXICON A_PAERRAI !!= * @CODE@ pärrai:pärr
+Attr:%>as #   ;
:a%{ʼØ%}i NMN_ZHEEVAI ;
:%>%{ʼØ%}j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
:%>%{ʼØ%}j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_SAELTTAI !!= * @CODE@ sälttai:sältt
+Attr:%>as #   ;
:a%{ʼØ%}i NMN_ZHEEVAI ;
:%>%{ʼØ%}j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
:%>%{ʼØ%}j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!%^RmVow%^I2J

LEXICON A_VELLAI !!= * @CODE@ vellai:vẹ%^1VOWll
! no attribute complementary distribution with noun veʹll-
:a%{ʼØ%}i NMN_ZHEEVAI ;
:%>%{ʼØ%}j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
:%>%{ʼØ%}j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;



!! CLASS 

LEXICON A_SOOUS
:%^V2VV%^XYY2VY AdjAttr-ZERO ;
: A-01_SOOUS ;

LEXICON A_SAJOS
!! -õs ending
: AdjAttr-ZERO ;
: SG-NOM ;
:%{XC%}%^C2CC%>â ESS ;
:%{XC%}%^C2CC%>â PAR ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%{XC%}%^K2GG%>â ESS ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%{XC%}%^K2GG%>â PAR ;
: A-01_OBL-SAJOS ;

LEXICON A_KOALVAK
+Attr:%^RmVow%>õs ENDLEX ;
:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/COMP_kwlmmsab ;
:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
: A-01_KOALVAK ;

LEXICON A_AACCIKH
+Attr:%^RmVow%^PALNo%>õs ENDLEX ;
:%^RmVow%^PALNo%> ADJ-DER/COMP_kwlmmsab ;
:%^RmVow%^PALNo%> ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
: A-01_AACCIKH ;

LEXICON A_KUYLAZH
+Sg+Nom:až ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Nom:až ENDLEX ; !!= * @CODE@ Check this 2015-02-22
: A-01_KUYLAZH ;
